src/morphology/stems/conjunctions.lexc
LEXICON Conjunctions

aga+CC:aga # ;
ega+CC:ega # ;
ehk+CS:ehk # ;
ehkki+CS:´ehkki # ;
elik+CC:elik # ;
ent+CC:´ent # ;
et+CS:´et # ;
ja+CC:ja # ;
justkui+CS:j´ust%#k´ui # ;
kui+CS:kui # ;
kuid+CC:kuid # ;
kuigi+CS:kuigi # ;
kuna+CS:kuna # ;
kuni+CC:kuni # ;
nagu+CS:nagu # ;
ning+CC:ning # ;
olgugi+CS:olgugi # ;
otsekui+CS:otse%#k´ui # ;
sest+CS:s´est # ;
siis+CS:s´iis # ;
vaid+CC:v´aid # ;
või+CC:või # ;
